District of Columbia statutes.
47-1019

Luther Statue Association.

The lands acquired and held by the Luther Statue Association, and the statue erected thereon, and all the improvements and appurtenances thereto, shall be entirely exempt from taxation, and shall not be chargeable or assessed for any purpose whatever; provided, that this section may be modified, repealed or amended, whenever Congress may see fit to do so.

History

Mar. 3, 1885, 23 Stat. 350, ch. 334, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1019.
1973 Ed., § 47-812.